test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-3lex_veeskir_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



  Noun - veeskir: # 2A v -kk, sk s'k, ee >iä, VV V; C stems Morottaja ja Olthuis - ok
    veeskir+N+Sg+Nom: veeskir
    veeskir+N+Sg+Gen: viäsˊkár
    veeskir+N+Sg+Acc: viäsˊkár
    veeskir+N+Sg+Ill: viäsˊkárân
    veeskir+N+Sg+Loc: viäsˊkárist
    veeskir+N+Sg+Com: viäsˊkáráin
    veeskir+N+Sg+Abe: viäsˊkárttáá
    veeskir+N+Ess:   [veˊskirin, viäsˊkárin]
    veeskir+N+Par:   [veˊskirid, viäsˊkárid]
    veeskir+N+Pl+Nom: viäsˊkáreh
    veeskir+N+Pl+Gen: viäsˊkárij
    veeskir+N+Pl+Acc: viäsˊkárijd
    veeskir+N+Pl+Ill: viäsˊkáráid
    veeskir+N+Pl+Loc: viäsˊkárijn
    veeskir+N+Pl+Com: viäsˊkárijguin
    veeskir+N+Pl+Abe: viäsˊkárijttáá

  Noun - njuođâs: # 2A
    njuođâs+N+Sg+Nom: njuođâs
    njuođâs+N+Sg+Gen: njuottâs
    njuođâs+N+Sg+Acc: njuottâs
    njuođâs+N+Sg+Ill: njuotˊtâsân
    njuođâs+N+Sg+Loc: njuotˊtâsist
    njuođâs+N+Sg+Com: njuotˊtâsáin
    njuođâs+N+Sg+Abe: njuottâsttáá
    njuođâs+N+Ess: njuoˊđâsin
    njuođâs+N+Par: njuoˊđâsid
    njuođâs+N+Pl+Nom: njuotˊtâseh
    njuođâs+N+Pl+Gen: njuotˊtâsij
    njuođâs+N+Pl+Acc: njuot'tâsijd
    njuođâs+N+Pl+Ill: njuot'tâsáid
    njuođâs+N+Pl+Loc: njuot'tâsijn
    njuođâs+N+Pl+Com: njuot'tâsijguin
    njuođâs+N+Pl+Abe: njuot'tâsijttáá

  Noun - kuálus: # 2A d -k, l > l'l
    kuálus+N+Sg+Nom: kuáḷus
    kuálus+N+Sg+Gen: kuálˊlus
    kuálus+N+Sg+Acc: kuálˊlus
    kuálus+N+Sg+Ill: kuáˊḷusân
    kuálus+N+Sg+Loc: kuáˊḷusist
    kuálus+N+Sg+Com: kuáˊḷusáin
    kuálus+N+Sg+Abe: kuállusttáá
    kuálus+N+Ess:    kuáˊḷusin
    kuálus+N+Par:    kuáˊḷusid
    kuálus+N+Pl+Nom: kuáˊḷuseh
    kuálus+N+Pl+Gen: kuá'lusij
    kuálus+N+Pl+Acc: kuálˊlusijd
    kuálus+N+Pl+Ill: kuálˊlusáid
    kuálus+N+Pl+Loc: kuálˊlusijn
    kuálus+N+Pl+Com: kuáˊḷusijguin
    kuálus+N+Pl+Abe: kuáˊḷusijttáá

  Noun - kiärgus: # 2A d -kk, rg > r'g
    kiärgus+N+Sg+Nom: kiärgus
    kiärgus+N+Sg+Gen: kiärˊgus
    kiärgus+N+Sg+Acc: kiärˊgus
    kiärgus+N+Sg+Ill: kiä'rgusân
    kiärgus+N+Sg+Loc: kiä'rgusist
    kiärgus+N+Sg+Com: kiä'rgusáin
    kiärgus+N+Sg+Abe: kiärgusttáá
    kiärgus+N+Ess: [kiä'rgusin, kiärgusin]
    kiärgus+N+Par: [kiä'rgusid, kiärgusid]
    kiärgus+N+Pl+Nom: kiä'rguseh
    kiärgus+N+Pl+Gen: kiä'rgusij
    kiärgus+N+Pl+Acc: kiä'rgusijd
    kiärgus+N+Pl+Ill: kiä'rgusáid
    kiärgus+N+Pl+Loc: kiä'rgusijn
    kiärgus+N+Pl+Com: kiä'rgusijguin
    kiärgus+N+Pl+Abe: kiä'rgusijttáá


  Noun - eebir: # 2A v - k -v, b > b'b, ee > iä, i>á
    eebir+N+Sg+Nom: eebir
    eebir+N+Sg+Gen: iäbˊbár
    eebir+N+Sg+Acc: iäbˊbár
    eebir+N+Sg+Ill: iäbˊbárân
    eebir+N+Sg+Loc: iäbˊbárist
    eebir+N+Sg+Com: iäbˊbáráin
    eebir+N+Sg+Abe: iäbˊbárttáá
    eebir+N+Ess: ebirin
    eebir+N+Par: ebirid
    eebir+N+Pl+Nom: iäbˊbáreh
    eebir+N+Pl+Gen: iäbˊbárij
    eebir+N+Pl+Acc: iäbˊbárijd
    eebir+N+Pl+Ill: iäbˊbáráid
    eebir+N+Pl+Loc: iäbˊbárijn
    eebir+N+Pl+Com: iäbˊbárijguin
    eebir+N+Pl+Abe: iäbˊbárijttáá


  Noun - čiepâs: # 2A d -k, p > p'p
    čiepâs+N+Sg+Nom: čiepâs
    čiepâs+N+Sg+Gen: čiepˊpâs
    čiepâs+N+Sg+Acc: čiepˊpâs
    čiepâs+N+Sg+Ill: čiepˊpâsân
    čiepâs+N+Sg+Loc: čiepˊpâsist
    čiepâs+N+Sg+Com: čiepˊpâsáin
    čiepâs+N+Sg+Abe: čiepˊpâsttáá
    čiepâs+N+Ess: [čieˊpâsin, čiepˊpâsin]
    čiepâs+N+Par: [čieˊpâsid, čiepˊpâsid]
    čiepâs+N+Pl+Nom: čiepˊpâseh
    čiepâs+N+Pl+Gen: čiepˊpâsij
    čiepâs+N+Pl+Acc: čiepˊpásijd
    čiepâs+N+Pl+Ill: čiepˊpâsáid
    čiepâs+N+Pl+Loc: čiepˊpâsijn
    čiepâs+N+Pl+Com: čiepˊpâsijguin
    čiepâs+N+Pl+Abe: čiepˊpâsijttáá


  Noun - čaˊskes: # 2A v > kk, e > a, ? > ?
    časkes+N+Sg+Nom: čaˊskes
    časkes+N+Sg+Gen: časkas
    časkes+N+Sg+Acc: časkas
    časkes+N+Sg+Ill: časkasân
    časkes+N+Sg+Loc: časkasist
    časkes+N+Sg+Com: časkasáin
    časkes+N+Sg+Abe: časkasttáá
    časkes+N+Ess: [časkasin, čaˊskesin]
    časkes+N+Par: [časkasid, čaˊskesid]
    časkes+N+Pl+Nom: časkaseh
    časkes+N+Pl+Gen: časkasij
    časkes+N+Pl+Acc: časkasijd
    časkes+N+Pl+Ill: časkasáid
    časkes+N+Pl+Loc: časkasijn
    časkes+N+Pl+Com: časkasijguin
    časkes+N+Pl+Abe: časkasijttáá
